Indiana, session 2026, SB206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-26-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.62-2009,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided by this section, this
chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) Excavation that is performed:
(A) only with a hand tool;
(B) on property owned or controlled by the person performing
the excavation; and
(C) to a depth not greater than twelve (12) inches.
(2) Excavation using only animals.
(3) Tilling of soil for agricultural purposes, such as plowing,
planting, and combining.
(4) Surface coal mining and reclamation operations conducted
under a permit issued by the natural resources commission under
IC 14-34.
(5) Railroad right-of-way maintenance or operations.
(6) Underground probing to determine the extent of gas
2026 IN 206—LS 6455/DI 119


migration.
(7) Excavation that is performed:
(A) only with a hand tool;
(B) by a communications service provider; and
(C) to a depth not greater than twelve (12) inches;
for the purpose of connecting a communications service
customer's home or business to the communications service
provider's own communications network.
(8) Excavation performed using only a directed stream of high
pressure air.
(9) Excavation performed solely by:
(A) injecting water into soil to create a mixture of water
and soil; and
(B) removing the mixture of water and soil using a
vacuum.
(b) This chapter does apply to blasting, setting drainage tile,
subsoiling, and other subsurface activities.
(c) Sections 16, 19, 20, and 22 of this chapter apply to the
construction and installation of railroad signal facilities and drainage
facilities at public grade crossings.
2026 IN 206—LS 6455/DI 119